Massachusetts, session 194th, H3802.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The third paragraph of section 33 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2010 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words "fire fighting purposes,”
the following words:- and every motor vehicle or trailer owned and operated by the United States
Air Force Auxiliary Massachusetts Civil Air Patrol,.
of 1